Mississippi, session 2026, HB4074.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Mobile Sports Wagering Act". SECTION 2.  The following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein: (a) "Commission" means the Mississippi Gaming Commission as defined in Section 75-76-7. (b) "Executive director" means the Executive Director of the Mississippi Gaming Commission as defined in Section 75-76-7. (c) "Game", "Gaming" or "Gambling game" means to deal, operate, carry on, conduct, maintain or expose for play any game as defined in Section 75-76-5. (d) "Gaming license" means any license issued by the state which authorizes the person named therein to engage in gaming as defined in Section 75-76-5. (e) "Gross revenue" means the same as defined in Section 75-76-5. (f) "Interactive gaming" means wagering on any interactive game. (g) "Interactive game" means computerized or virtual versions of any game as defined in Section 75-76-5 or any other game of chance or digital simulation thereof, including, but not limited to, casino themed slot machines or gaming devices, table games or other such games as approved by the commission for play in a licensed establishment. (h) "Internet" means the term as defined in Section 230 of Title II of the Communications Act of 1934, Chapter 652, 110 Stat. 137, 47 USCS 230. (i) "Licensed gaming establishment" means any premises licensed by the commission as defined in Section 75-76-5. (j) "Manufacturer's", "seller's", or "distributor's" license means a license issued pursuant to Section 75-76-79 as defined in Section 75-76-5. (k) "Online race book" means a race book as defined by  Section 75-76-5 in which wagers are made over the Internet, including on websites, personal computers, mobile phones, or other interactive devices used by an individual to place a race book wager from any location in Mississippi, and accepted by a platform on behalf of the holder of a Mississippi gaming license. (l) "Online sports pool" means a sports pool as defined by Section 75-76-5 in which wagers are made over the Internet, including on websites, personal computers, mobile phones, or other interactive devices used by an individual to place a sports pool wager from any location in Mississippi, and accepted by a platform on behalf of the holder of a Mississippi gaming license. (m) "Platform" means a person or entity that operates an online sports pool, online race book, or both on behalf of the holder of a gaming license. (n) "Race book" means the business of accepting wagers upon the outcome of any event held at a track which uses the pari-mutuel system of wagering as defined in Section 75-76-5. (o) "Sporting event" means any amateur sport or athletic event, professional sport or athletic event, collegiate sport or athletic event, motor race event, electronic sports event, competitive video game event, or any other event authorized by the Mississippi Gaming Control Act or the commission for wagering under this act. (p) "Sports pool" means the same as the term is defined in Section 75-76-5 and includes the business of accepting wagers on sporting events by any system of wagering including, but not limited to, single-game bets, teaser bets, parlays, over-under, moneyline, pools, exchange-wagering, in-game wagering, in-play bets, proposition bets, and straight bets.  The term does not include fantasy contests as defined in Section 97-33-303. SECTION 3.  (1)  Online sports pools and online race books shall be legal in the State of Mississippi as provided by this act.  The provisions of this act shall not be construed to authorize or legalize interactive gaming in the State of Mississippi rather all forms of interactive gaming are expressly prohibited and are illegal in the State of Mississippi, punishable pursuant to the provisions of Section 97-33-1 and other applicable laws.  Further, if any person or platform is found by the commission to have engaged in any form of illegal gaming, including, but not limited to, any form of interactive gaming, then such person and platform will be subject to action by the Mississippi Gaming Commission in accordance with Section 75-76-67.  These restrictions will be applied whether the platform or person is found to have engaged in such illegal activity in Mississippi or in any other jurisdiction. (2) (a)  A platform that operates an online sports pool, online race book, or both on behalf of the holder of a gaming license in this state must obtain a manufacturer's and distributor's license from the commission in order to offer such services, and such license will be conditioned upon platform abiding by all laws and regulations governing such activities.  A platform that already possesses a manufacturer's and distributor's license in the state shall be permitted to operate under the existing license subject to any technical approvals required by the commission to operate an online sports pool, online race book, or both. (b) The licensed gaming establishment, including a platform that operates an online sports pool, online race book or both on behalf of the holder of a gaming licensee, shall report all gaming revenue and pay all taxes for such revenue as provided by state law. (3) A platform that operates an online sports pool, online race book, or both on behalf of the holder of a gaming license in this state shall be lawfully conducting business in this state in order to comply with the provisions of this act. (4) Application for licensure shall be made to the executive director on forms furnished by the executive director and in accordance with the commission's regulations regarding manufacturer's and distributor's licenses. No platform will be issued a gaming license, rather it shall be required to contract with a licensed casino operator in order to conduct online sports pool or online race book activities in Mississippi.  The commission shall only issue a gaming license to a legal gaming establishment located on a premises in a county where gaming may be conducted in accordance with Mississippi law that is operating a casino in a county that has not prohibited gaming by a referendum vote of registered voters pursuant to Section 19-3-79.  Should a gaming license expire, be revoked or be suspended, then all such online activities associated with that gaming license will cease until such time that the commission renews the license or issues an order allowing the gaming licensee to recommence its gaming operations. (5) The contractual terms between a licensed gaming operator and the licensed platform shall be consistent with Mississippi law, including, but not limited to, the terms of this Act. (6) The commission shall, from time to time, adopt, amend or repeal such regulations, consistent with the policy, objects and purposes of this chapter, as it may deem necessary or desirable in the public interest in carrying out the policy and provisions of this chapter.  The commission shall comply with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law when adopting, amending or repealing any regulations authorized under this section or under any other provision of this chapter. (7) The Commission shall promulgate rules and regulations that require a licensee to implement responsible sport betting programs.  Such rules and regulations shall require a licensee to develop a strategic implementation plan with details as to: (a) The use of player data and technology to aid in identifying potential problem gamblers; (b) The use of automated triggers to identify and manage accounts or potential problem gamblers; and (c) The levels of intervention and education provided to identify at-risk players, which shall include at a minimum: (i) A first phase involving communications with the individual in order to educate him or her on the availability of various responsible gaming features and resources offered by the licensee; (ii) A second phase that includes a video tutorial displayed to the individual either as one or multiple videos that provides education on the features and resources available; and (iii) A third phase, when warranted, that includes access to a list of responsible gaming professionals provided by the licensee to advise the individual on possible corrective actions to address at-risk behavior. (8) The commission shall establish, via administrative order or regulation, a universal start date for all licensed online sports pool platforms and all licensed online race book platforms to commence accepting online wagers outside of a licensed gaming premises.  This universal start date shall be no later than December 8, 2026. SECTION 4.  (1)  Each licensed establishment may enter into contracts with no more than two (2) platforms to operate an online sports pool and no more than two (2) online race book platforms to operate online race book.  Each platform may, but is not required to, offer both an online sports pool and an online race book.  No platform, individually or collectively with any other platform or other party, shall take any action that would restrict or limit a single casino license holder, or a group of casino license holders, from offering online sports pool or online race book services to customers.  The commission shall maintain a list of licensed platforms to be made available to licensed casino operators.  If a platform receives a request from a licensed casino operator to discuss business terms related to providing online sports pool or online race book services to its customers, then the platform will engage in good-faith discussions with the licensed casino operator.  The platform will be subject to Sections 75-76-157 through 75-76-173 and subject to regulations authorized under this act, as well as the Mississippi Gaming Control Act, which may require a platform to appear before the commission or in a court proceeding to respond to any player dispute or an order to show cause issued by the commission.  Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a platform may, on behalf of its gaming license holder, determine whether to accept or reject wagers, determine the results of wagers, and payout winning wagers. (2) A platform, on behalf of the holder of a gaming license in this state, may accept online sports pool and online race book wagers placed over the Internet, including on websites and the use of a personal computer, mobile phone, or other interactive device used by an individual to place a sports pool or race book wager, subject to the following: (a) All players shall establish a wagering account and an initial identification and age verification shall be conducted before any wager by the player may be accepted by the platform.  A player may establish a wagering account with a platform in person at a licensed establishment or over the Internet, including on websites and mobile or interactive devices. (b) A platform, on behalf of the holder of a gaming license in this state, shall accept wagers only from players located in Mississippi.  A platform shall maintain geofencing or geolocating services and pay all costs and responsibilities related to such services required by the commission.  Servers, including the use of backup servers, may be located outside of this state, consistent with federal law.  To the extent required by federal law, a platform shall maintain in this state the servers it uses to accept wagers on an online sports pool or online race book placed by bettors located in this state.  A platform shall comply with all identification verification requirements and will take other commercially reasonable steps to prevent compulsive and problem gaming and to ensure that no person who is restricted or who is ineligible to participate in online gaming is able to use the platform to place bets or wagers on events. (c) A platform shall take commercially reasonable steps to prevent any person who is self-excluded from entering a gaming property in Mississippi from opening an online wagering account.  The Mississippi Gaming Commission shall maintain this list of individuals and provide it to platforms on a regular basis. (d) A platform, in addition, shall take commercially reasonable steps to ensure that any person who is a player, a coach, umpire, or referee or who is otherwise associated with a collegiate team or a professional team or an athletic event, are prohibited from wagering on sporting events for which they are affiliated.  The Mississippi Gaming Commission shall maintain this list of individuals and provide it to platforms on a regular basis. The platform should further alert customers that violating this restriction or aiding any person who is a minor, a self-excluded person or any other person who is otherwise restricted from wagering online to circumvent such restrictions (either intentionally or in failing to use reasonable steps to properly secure a device), shall be disqualified from participating in any form or online gaming thereafter. (e) A person under the age of twenty-one (21) years shall not play, be allowed to play, place wagers, or collect winnings, whether personally or through an agent, from any online sports pool or online race book authorized under this chapter. (f) A platform shall comply with all identification verification and compulsive and problem gambling protections set forth in law or rule. (g)  All platforms must utilize artificial intelligence or equivalent algorithmic monitoring to detect "at-risk" betting behavior.  Licensees shall implement mandatory "cooling-off" periods and proactive intervention for patrons displaying signs of problem gaming. (h)  For any patron between the ages of eighteen (18) and twenty-five (25) years, the total monthly wagering amount across all sports wagering platforms shall be limited to Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00).  A patron may exceed this limit only if he or she provides the licensee with verifiable documentation substantiating that their annual gross income exceeds the most recent Mississippi state median household income as reported by the United States Census Bureau. (3) Subject to the regulations of the commission, a platform shall report to the commission: (a) Any criminal proceeding commenced against the platform or its employees in connection with the platform's operations in Mississippi. (b) Any abnormal betting activity or patterns that may indicate a concern about the integrity of a sporting event or athletic event. (c) Any other conduct indicating corruption of the betting outcome of a sporting event or athletic event for financial gain, including, but not limited to, match fixing as well as any restricted person wagering on an event in which they are participating or otherwise affiliated. (d) Suspicious or illegal wagering activities, including the use of funds derived from illegal activity, wagers to conceal or launder funds derived from illegal activity, use of agents to place wagers, or use of false identification.  In such a case where information reported from paragraphs (a) through (d), the platform shall work together with the licensed casino operator and the commission to investigate such matters and to ensure that the accounts affected by or associated with such circumstances are suspended at least until such time that the commission is able to fully investigate the matters and determine the appropriate enforcement action. (4) A dispute over winnings with respect to an online race book or online sports pool shall be resolved under the procedures set forth in Sections 75-76-157 through 75-76-173. SECTION 5.  (1)  Gross revenue from a platform operating an online race book or an online sports pool on behalf of the holder of a gaming license shall be subject to the license fees and credits under Sections 75-76-177, 75-76-179, 75-76-181 and 75-76-185. (2)  In addition to any taxes and fees provided for by law, there is imposed and levied a tax in the amount of twenty-two percent (22%) upon all gross gaming revenue from a platform operating an online race book or an online sports pool on behalf of the holder of a gaming license. SECTION 6.  (1)  There is created the "Mobile Sports Wagering Tax Fund", which shall consist of taxes and fees generated and collected under the Mobile Sports Wagering Act.  The Department of Revenue shall be custodian of the fund.  Any interest and monies earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund.  The fund shall be a dedicated fund and shall be distributed as follows: (a)  (i)  Until June 30, 2030, the first Six Million Dollars ($6,000,000.00) deposited to the Mobile Sports Wagering Tax Fund each year shall be transferred into the Retail Sports Wagering Protection Fund, which is created in subsection (2) of this section. At the end of each calendar year, any licensed gaming establishment without a platform whose total annual sports wagering revenue is below the total annual retail sports wagering revenue the same licensed gaming establishment without a platform received in 2026 may apply for a portion of the funds in the Retail Sports Wagering Protection Fund.  The commission shall allocate funds in the Retail Sports Wagering Protection Fund proportionately among eligible applicants, but in no case shall a licensed gaming establishment without a platform receive more funds than the amount of the difference between its current year retail sports wagering revenue and 2026 sports wagering revenue. Any funds remaining in the Retail Sports Wagering Protection Fund after this distribution shall be returned to the Mobile Sports Wagering Tax fund for distribution in compliance with subparagraph (ii). (ii)  Until June 30, 2030, subject to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, the remainder of funds in the Mobile Sports Wagering Tax Fund shall be paid on or before the last day of each month by the Department of Revenue to the State Treasurer to be deposited in the Employers' Accumulation Account of the Public Employees' Retirement System created in Section 25-11-123(c). (b)  From and after July 1, 2030, subject to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, all monies which shall consist of taxes and fees generated and collected under the Mobile Sports Wagering Act and deposited to the Mobile Sports Wagering Tax Fund shall be paid on or before the last day of each month by the Department of Revenue to the State Treasurer to be deposited in the Employers' Accumulation Account of the Public Employees' Retirement System created in Section 25-11-123(c). (2)  There is created the "Retail Sports Wagering Protection Fund", which shall consist of taxes and fees transferred from the Mobile Sports Wagering Tax Fund as described in subsection (1)(a) (i) of this section. (3)  The provisions of subsection (1)(a)(ii) and subsection (1)(b) of this section shall be applicable only during such time as the assumed rate of return on investments for the assets of the Public Employees' Retirement System is equal to or greater than the actuarial assumed rate of return on investments for the assets of the system on January 1, 2020. SECTION 7.  Section 97-33-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-33-17. (1)  All monies exhibited for the purpose of betting or alluring persons to bet at any game, and all monies staked or betted, shall be liable to seizure by any sheriff, constable, or police officer, together with all the appliances used or kept for use in gambling, or by any other person; and all the monies so seized shall be accounted for by the person making the seizure, and all appliances seized shall be destroyed; provided, however, this section shall not apply to betting, gaming or wagering * * * on: (a) On a cruise vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is in the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; (b) In a structure located in whole or in part on shore in any of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi in which the registered voters of the county have voted to allow such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79, if: (i) The structure is owned, leased or controlled by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, to conduct legal gaming on a cruise vessel under paragraph (a) of this subsection; (ii) The part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is located entirely in an area which is located no more than eight hundred (800) feet from the mean high water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) of the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, or, with regard to Harrison County only, no farther north than the southern boundary of the right-of-way for U.S. Highway 90, whichever is greater; and (iii) In the case of a structure that is located in whole or part on shore, the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted shall lie adjacent to state waters south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  When the site upon which the structure is located consists of a parcel of real property, easements and rights-of-way for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of the parcel, nor shall the footage contained within the easements and rights-of-way be counted in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii) * * *.; (c) A vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is on the Mississippi River or navigable waters within any county bordering on the Mississippi River, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; or (d) That is legal under the laws of the State of Mississippi. (2) Nothing in this section shall apply to any gambling device, machine or equipment that is owned, possessed, controlled, installed, procured, repaired or transported in accordance with subsection (4) of Section 97-33-7. SECTION 8.  Section 75-76-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-76-5. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise: (a) "Applicant" means any person who has applied for or is about to apply for a state gaming license, registration or finding of suitability under the provisions of this chapter or approval of any act or transaction for which approval is required or permitted under the provisions of this chapter. (b) "Application" means a request for the issuance of a state gaming license, registration or finding of suitability under the provisions of this chapter or for approval of any act or transaction for which approval is required or permitted under the provisions of this chapter but does not include any supplemental forms or information that may be required with the application. (c) "Associated equipment" means any equipment or mechanical, electromechanical or electronic contrivance, component or machine used remotely or directly in connection with gaming or with any game, race book or sports pool that would not otherwise be classified as a gaming device, including dice, playing cards, links which connect to progressive slot machines, equipment which affects the proper reporting of gross revenue, computerized systems of betting at a race book or sports pool, computerized systems for monitoring slot machines, and devices for weighing or counting money. (d) "Chairman" means the Chairman of the Mississippi Gaming Commission except when used in the term "Chairman of the State Tax Commission." "Chairman of the State Tax Commission" or "commissioner" means the Commissioner of Revenue of the Department of Revenue. (e) "Commission" or "Mississippi Gaming Commission" means the Mississippi Gaming Commission. (f) "Commission member" means a member of the Mississippi Gaming Commission. (g) "Credit instrument" means a writing which evidences a gaming debt owed to a person who holds a license at the time the debt is created, and includes any writing taken in consolidation, redemption or payment of a prior credit instrument. (h) "Enforcement division" means a particular division supervised by the executive director that provides enforcement functions. (i) "Establishment" means any premises wherein or whereon any gaming is done. (j) "Executive director" means the Executive Director of the Mississippi Gaming Commission. (k) Except as otherwise provided by law, "game," or "gambling game" means any banking or percentage game played with cards, with dice or with any mechanical, electromechanical or electronic device or machine for money, property, checks, credit or any representative of value, including, without limiting, the generality of the foregoing, faro, monte, roulette, keno, fan tan, twenty one, blackjack, seven and a half, big injun, klondike, craps, poker, chuck a luck (dai shu), wheel of fortune, chemin de fer, baccarat, pai gow, beat the banker, panguingui, slot machine, or any other game or device approved by the commission.  However, "game" or "gambling game" shall not include bingo games or raffles which are held pursuant to the provisions of Section 97-33-51, or the illegal gambling activities described in Section 97-33-8. The commission shall not be required to recognize any game hereunder with respect to which the commission determines it does not have sufficient experience or expertise. (l) "Gaming" or "gambling" means to deal, operate, carry on, conduct, maintain or expose for play any game as defined in this chapter. (m) "Gaming device" means any mechanical, electromechanical or electronic contrivance, component or machine used in connection with gaming or any game which affects the result of a wager by determining win or loss.  The term includes a system for processing information which can alter the normal criteria of random selection, which affects the operation of any game, or which determines the outcome of a game.  The term does not include a system or device which affects a game solely by stopping its operation so that the outcome remains undetermined, and does not include any antique coin machine as defined in Section 27-27-12. (n) "Gaming employee" means any person connected directly with the operation of a gaming establishment licensed to conduct any game, including: (i) Boxmen; (ii) Cashiers; (iii) Change personnel; (iv) Counting room personnel; (v) Dealers; (vi) Floormen; (vii) Hosts or other persons empowered to extend credit or complimentary services; (viii) Keno runners; (ix) Keno writers; (x) Machine mechanics; (xi) Security personnel; (xii) Shift or pit bosses; (xiii) Shills; (xiv) Supervisors or managers; and (xv) Ticket writers. The term "gaming employee" also includes employees of manufacturers or distributors of gaming equipment within this state whose duties are directly involved with the manufacture, repair or distribution of gaming equipment. "Gaming employee" does not include bartenders, cocktail waitresses or other persons engaged in preparing or serving food or beverages unless acting in some other capacity. (o) "Gaming license" means any license issued by the state which authorizes the person named therein to engage in gaming. (p) "Gross revenue" means the total of all of the following, less the total of all cash paid out as losses to patrons and those amounts paid to purchase annuities to fund losses paid to patrons over several years by independent financial institutions: (i) Cash received as winnings; (ii) Cash received in payment for credit extended by a licensee to a patron for purposes of gaming; and (iii) Compensation received for conducting any game in which the licensee is not party to a wager. For the purposes of this definition, cash or the value of noncash prizes awarded to patrons in a contest or tournament are not losses. The term does not include: (i) Counterfeit money or tokens; (ii) Coins of other countries which are received in gaming devices; (iii) Cash taken in fraudulent acts perpetrated against a licensee for which the licensee is not reimbursed; or (iv) Cash received as entry fees for contests or tournaments in which the patrons compete for prizes. (q) "Hearing examiner" means a member of the Mississippi Gaming Commission or other person authorized by the commission to conduct hearings. (r) "Investigation division" means a particular division supervised by the executive director that provides investigative functions. (s) "License" means a gaming license or a manufacturer's, seller's or distributor's license. (t) "Licensee" means any person to whom a valid license has been issued. (u) "License fees" means monies required by law to be paid to obtain or continue a gaming license or a manufacturer's, seller's or distributor's license. (v) "Licensed gaming establishment" means any premises licensed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter wherein or whereon gaming is done. (w) "Manufacturer's," "seller's" or "distributor's" license means a license issued pursuant to Section 75-76-79. (x) "Navigable waters" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term under Section 27-109-1. (y) "Operation" means the conduct of gaming. (z) "Party" means the Mississippi Gaming Commission and any licensee or other person appearing of record in any proceeding before the commission; or the Mississippi Gaming Commission and any licensee or other person appearing of record in any proceeding for judicial review of any action, decision or order of the commission. (aa) "Person" includes any association, corporation, firm, partnership, trust or other form of business association as well as a natural person. (bb) "Premises" means land, together with all buildings, improvements and personal property located thereon, and includes all parts of any vessel or cruise vessel. (cc) "Race book" means the business of accepting wagers upon the outcome of any event held at a track which uses the pari-mutuel system of wagering and includes "online race book" as defined by this act. (dd) "Regulation" means a rule, standard, directive or statement of general applicability which effectuates law or policy or which describes the procedure or requirements for practicing before the commission.  The term includes a proposed regulation and the amendment or repeal of a prior regulation but does not include: (i) A statement concerning only the internal management of the commission and not affecting the rights or procedures available to any licensee or other person; (ii) A declaratory ruling; (iii) An interagency memorandum; (iv) The commission's decision in a contested case or relating to an application for a license; or (v) Any notice concerning the fees to be charged which are necessary for the administration of this chapter. (ee) "Respondent" means any licensee or other person against whom a complaint has been filed with the commission. (ff) "Slot machine" means any mechanical, electrical or other device, contrivance or machine which, upon insertion of a coin, token or similar object, or upon payment of any consideration, is available to play or operate, the play or operation of which, whether by reason of the skill of the operator or application of the element of chance, or both, may deliver or entitle the person playing or operating the machine to receive cash, premiums, merchandise, tokens or anything of value, whether the payoff is made automatically from the machine or in any other manner.  The term does not include any antique coin machine as defined in Section 27-27-12. (gg) "Sports pool" means the business of accepting wagers on collegiate or professional sporting events or athletic events, by any system or method of wagering other than the system known as the "pari-mutuel method of wagering * * *.", and includes "online sports pool" as defined by this act. (hh) "State Tax Commission" or "department" means the Department of Revenue of the State of Mississippi. (ii) "Temporary work permit" means a work permit which is valid only for a period not to exceed ninety (90) days from its date of issue and which is not renewable. (jj) "Vessel" or "cruise vessel" shall have the meanings ascribed to such terms under Section 27-109-1. (kk) "Work permit" means any card, certificate or permit issued by the commission, whether denominated as a work permit, registration card or otherwise, authorizing the employment of the holder as a gaming employee.  A document issued by any governmental authority for any employment other than gaming is not a valid work permit for the purposes of this chapter. (ll) "School or training institution" means any school or training institution which is licensed by the commission to teach or train gaming employees pursuant to Section 75-76-34. (mm) "Cheat" means to alter the selection of criteria that determine: (i) The rules of a game; or (ii) The amount or frequency of payment in a game. (nn) "Promotional activity" means an activity or event conducted or held for the purpose of promoting or marketing the individual licensed gaming establishment that is engaging in the promotional activity.  The term includes, but is not limited to, a game of any kind other than as defined in paragraph (k) of this section, a tournament, a contest, a drawing, or a promotion of any kind. SECTION 9.  Section 75-76-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-76-33. (1)  The commission shall, from time to time, adopt, amend or repeal such regulations, consistent with the policy, objects and purposes of this chapter, as it may deem necessary or desirable in the public interest in carrying out the policy and provisions of this chapter.  The commission shall comply with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law when adopting, amending or repealing any regulations authorized under this section or under any other provision of this chapter. (2) These regulations shall, without limiting the general powers herein conferred, include the following: (a) Prescribing the method and form of application which any applicant for a license or for a manufacturer's, seller's or distributor's license must follow and complete before consideration of his application by the executive director or the commission. (b) Prescribing the information to be furnished by any applicant or licensee concerning his antecedents, habits, character, associates, criminal record, business activities and financial affairs, past or present. (c) Prescribing the information to be furnished by a licensee relating to his employees. (d) Requiring fingerprinting of an applicant or licensee, and gaming employees of a licensee, or other methods of identification and the forwarding of all fingerprints taken pursuant to regulation of the Federal Bureau of Investigation. (e) Prescribing the manner and procedure of all hearings conducted by the commission or any hearing examiner of the commission, including special rules of evidence applicable thereto and notices thereof. (f) Requiring any applicant to pay all or any part of the fees and costs of investigation of such applicant as may be determined by the commission under paragraph (g) of this subsection (2). (g) Prescribing the amounts of investigative fees only as authorized by regulations of the commission under paragraph (f) of this subsection, and collecting those fees.  The commission shall adopt regulations setting the amounts of those fees at levels that will provide the commission with sufficient revenue, when combined with any other monies as may be deposited into the Mississippi Gaming Commission Fund created in Section 75-76-325, to carry out the provisions of this chapter without any state general funds.  In calculating the amount of such fees, the commission shall: (i) Attempt to set the fees at levels that will create a balance in the Mississippi Gaming Commission Fund that does not exceed, at the end of any state fiscal year, two percent (2%) of the projected amount of funds that will provide the commission with such sufficient revenue; and (ii) Demonstrate the reasonableness of the relationship between a fee and the actual costs of the investigative activity for which the fee is being prescribed. (h) Prescribing the manner and method of collection and payment of fees and issuance of licenses. (i) Prescribing under what conditions a licensee may be deemed subject to revocation or suspension of his license. (j) Requiring any applicant or licensee to waive any privilege with respect to any testimony at any hearing or meeting of the commission, except any privilege afforded by the Constitution of the United States or this state. (k) Defining and limiting the area, games and devices permitted, and the method of operation of such games and devices, for the purposes of this chapter. (l) Prescribing under what conditions the nonpayment of a gambling debt by a licensee shall be deemed grounds for revocation or suspension of his license. (m) Governing the use and approval of gambling devices and equipment. (n) Prescribing the qualifications of, and the conditions under which, attorneys, accountants and others are permitted to practice before the commission. (o) Restricting access to confidential information obtained under this chapter and ensuring that the confidentiality of such information is maintained and protected. (p) Prescribing the manner and procedure by which the executive director on behalf of the commission shall notify a county or a municipality wherein an applicant for a license desires to locate. (q) Prescribing the manner and procedure for an objection to be filed with the commission and the executive director by a county or municipality wherein an applicant for a license desires to locate. (3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each licensee shall be required to comply with the regulation that no wager may be placed by, or on behalf of, any individual or entity or group, not present on a licensed vessel or cruise vessel, except through an online sports pool or online race book, or as otherwise provided by this act. (4) From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law. (5) From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section. SECTION 10.  Section 75-76-89, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-76-89. (1)  Except as otherwise provided in subsection ( * * *32) of this section, all licenses issued to the same person, including a wholly owned subsidiary of that person, for the operation of any game, including a sports pool or race book, whether online or in person, which authorize gaming at the same establishment must be merged into a single gaming license.  A gaming license may not be issued to any person if the issuance would result in more than one (1) licensed operation at a single establishment, unless authorized by this act whether or not the profits or revenue from gaming are shared between the licensed operations.  This shall in no way be interpreted to mean that a platform is the holder of a gaming license. (2) A person who has been issued a gaming license may establish a sports pool or race book on the premises of the establishment at which he or she conducts a gaming operation only after obtaining permission from the executive director which permission shall be subject to approval of the terms of any contracts to ensure compliance with state gaming laws entered by the gaming licensee with a licensed platform and any other such third parties providing related services. SECTION 11.  Section 75-76-91, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-76-91.  (1)  All licenses issued under the provisions of this chapter must be posted by the licensee and kept posted at all times in a conspicuous place in the establishment for which issued until replaced by a succeeding license.  The gaming licensee shall also conspicuously post the license for the platform used in its establishment. (2)  All licenses may be inspected by authorized state, county and municipal officials. SECTION 12.  Section 75-76-129, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: [Through June 30, 2028, this section shall read as follows:] 75-76-129. (1)  On or before the last day of each month all taxes, fees, interest, penalties, damages, fines or other monies collected by the Department of Revenue during that month under the provisions of this chapter, with the exception of (a) the local government fees imposed under Section 75-76-195, and (b) an amount equal to Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) of the revenue collected pursuant to the fee imposed under Section 75-76-177(1)(c), * * *and (c) the revenue collected pursuant to the fee imposed under Section 75-76-177(1)(c) as a result of wagers on sporting events and (d) the revenue collected pursuant to the Mobile Sports Wagering Act from online sports pools and online racebooks shall be paid by the Department of Revenue to the State Treasurer to be deposited in the State General Fund.  The local government fees shall be distributed by the Department of Revenue pursuant to Section 75-76-197. (2) An amount equal to Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) of the revenue collected during that month pursuant to the fee imposed under Section 75-76-177(1)(c) shall be deposited by the Department of Revenue into the bond sinking fund created in Section 1(3) of Chapter 479, Laws of 2015. (3) Revenue collected pursuant to the fee imposed under Section 75-76-177(1)(c) as a result of wagers on sporting events shall be deposited into the State Highway Fund to be used solely for the repair and maintenance of highways and bridges of the State of Mississippi.  This revenue shall be used first for matching funds made available to the state for such purposes pursuant to any federal highway infrastructure program implemented after September 1, 2018. (4) Revenue collected pursuant to the fee imposed pursuant to Section 75-76-177(c) as a result of wagers on online sports pools and online race books shall be deposited into the "Mobile Sports Wagering Tax Fund" as provided in Section 6 of this act. [From and after July 1, 2028, this section shall read as follows:] 75-76-129. (1)  On or before the last day of each month all taxes, fees, interest, penalties, damages, fines or other monies collected by the Department of Revenue during that month under the provisions of this chapter, with the exception of (a) the local government fees imposed under Section 75-76-195, * * *and (b) an amount equal to Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) of the revenue collected pursuant to the fee imposed under Section 75-76-177(1)(c), and (c) the revenue collected pursuant to the Mobile Sports Wagering Act from online sports pools and online racebooks shall be paid by the Department of Revenue to the State Treasurer to be deposited in the State General Fund.  The local government fees shall be distributed by the Department of Revenue pursuant to Section 75-76-197.  An amount equal to Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) of the revenue collected during that month pursuant to the fee imposed under Section 75-76-177(1)(c) shall be deposited by the Department of Revenue into the bond sinking fund created in Section 1(3) of Chapter 479, Laws of 2015. (2) Revenue collected pursuant to the fee imposed pursuant to Section 75-76-177(c) as a result of wagers on online sports pools and online race books shall be deposited into the "Mobile Sports Wagering Tax Fund" as provided in Section 6 of this act. SECTION 13.  Section 75-76-203, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-76-203.  In order to be eligible to receive a state gaming license, a corporation shall: (a)  Be incorporated: (i)  In the State of Mississippi, although such corporation may be a wholly or partly owned subsidiary of a corporation which is chartered in another state of the United States; or (ii)  In another state of the United States, if all persons having any direct or indirect interest of any nature in such corporation are licensed as required by this chapter and any applicable regulations of the commission; (b)  Maintain an office of the corporation on the licensed premises, except for any platform that operates on behalf of a holder of a gaming license in this state; (c)  Comply with all of the requirements of the laws of the State of Mississippi pertaining to corporations; and (d)  Maintain a ledger in the principal office of the corporation in Mississippi, which shall: (i)  At all times reflect the ownership of every class of security issued by the corporation; and (ii)  Be available for inspection by the commission or the executive director or his employees at all reasonable times without notice. SECTION 14.  Section 75-76-205, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 75-76-205.  No domestic corporation is eligible to receive a gaming license unless it is in good standing in this state.  No foreign corporation is eligible to receive a gaming license unless it qualifies to do business in this state. SECTION 15.  Section 75-76-211, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 75-76-211.  All officers and directors of the corporation which holds or applies for a state gaming license must be licensed individually, according to the provisions of this chapter; and if, in the judgment of the commission, the public interest will be served by requiring any or all of the corporation's individual stockholders, lenders, holders of evidences of indebtedness, underwriters, key executives, agents or employees to be licensed, the corporation shall require such persons to apply for a license in accordance with the laws and requirements in effect at the time the commission requires such licensing.  A person who is required to be licensed by this section shall apply for a license within thirty (30) days after he becomes an officer or director.  A person who is required to be licensed pursuant to a decision of the commission shall apply for a license within thirty (30) days after the executive director requests him to do so. SECTION 16.  Section 75-76-55, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 75-76-55. (1)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 75-76-34, it is unlawful for any person, either as owner, lessee or employee, whether for hire or not, either solely or in conjunction with others, without having first procured and thereafter maintaining in effect a state gaming license: (a) To deal, operate, carry on, conduct, maintain or expose for play in the State of Mississippi any gambling game, including, without limitation, any gaming device, slot machine, race book or sports pool; (b) To provide or maintain any information service the primary purpose of which is to aid the placing or making of wagers on events of any kind; or (c) To receive, directly or indirectly, any compensation or reward or any percentage or share of the money or property played, for keeping, running or carrying on any gambling game, including, without limitation, any slot machine, gaming device, race book or sports pool. (2) Except as otherwise provided in Section 75-76-34, it is unlawful for any person knowingly to permit any gambling game, including, without limitation, any slot machine, gaming device, race book or sports pool to be conducted, operated, dealt or carried on in any house or building or other premises owned by him, in whole or in part, by a person who is not licensed pursuant to this chapter or by his employee. SECTION 17.  Section 75-76-79, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-76-79. (1)  (a)  Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, it is unlawful for any person, either as owner, lessee or employee, whether for hire or not, to operate, carry on, conduct or maintain any form of manufacture, selling or distribution of any gaming device for use or play in Mississippi or for distribution outside of Mississippi without first procuring and maintaining all required federal and state licenses. (b) A lessor who specifically acquires equipment for a capital lease is not required to be licensed under this section. (c) The holder of a state gaming license or the holding company of a corporate licensee may, within two (2) years after cessation of business or upon specific approval by the executive director, dispose of by sale in a manner approved by the executive director, any or all of its gaming devices, including slot machines, without a distributor's license.  In cases of bankruptcy of a state gaming licensee or foreclosure of a lien by a bank or other person holding a security interest for which gaming devices are security, in whole or in part, for the lien, the executive director may authorize the disposition of the gaming devices without requiring a distributor's license. (d) Any person whom the commission determines is a suitable person to receive a license under the provisions of this section may be issued a manufacturer's or distributor's license.  The burden of proving his qualification to receive or hold a license under this section is at all times on the applicant or licensee. (e) Every person who must be licensed pursuant to this section is subject to the provisions of Sections 75-76-199 through 75-76-265, unless exempted from those provisions by the commission. (f) The commission may exempt, for any purpose, a manufacturer, seller or distributor from the provisions of Sections 75-76-199 through 75-76-265, if the commission determines that the exemption is consistent with the purposes of this chapter. (g) As used in this section, "holding company" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 75-76-199. (2) If the commission determines that a manufacturer or distributor is unsuitable to receive or hold a license: (a) No new gaming device or associated equipment manufactured by the manufacturer or distributed by the distributor may be approved; (b) Any previously approved device or associated equipment manufactured by the manufacturer or distributed by the distributor is subject to revocation of approval if the reasons for the denial of the license also apply to that device or associated equipment; (c) No new device or associated equipment manufactured by the manufacturer or distributed by the distributor may be sold, transferred or offered for use or play in Mississippi; and (d) Any association or agreement between the manufacturer or distributor and a licensee must be terminated, unless otherwise provided by the commission.  An agreement between such a manufacturer or distributor of gaming devices or associated equipment and a licensee shall be deemed to include a provision for its termination without liability on the part of the licensee upon a finding by the commission that the manufacturer is unsuitable to be associated with a gaming enterprise.  Failure to include that condition in the agreement is not a defense in any action brought pursuant to this section to terminate the agreement. (3) Failure of a licensee to terminate any association or agreement with a manufacturer or distributor of gaming devices or associated equipment after receiving notice of a determination of unsuitability, the denial of a license or failure to file a timely application for a license, is an unsuitable method of operation. (4) There is hereby imposed and levied on each applicant for a manufacturer's, seller's or distributor's license under this section an annual license fee in the following amount: (a) For the issuance or continuation of a manufacturer's license, One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00). (b) For the issuance or continuation of a seller's or distributor's license, Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00). This fee is to be paid by the applicant to the * * *State Tax Commission Department of Revenue on or before the filing of the application for a manufacturer's, seller's or distributor's license by the applicant.  Upon such payment the * * *Chairman of the State Tax Commission Commissioner of Revenue shall certify to the executive director that such fee has been paid by the applicant. Except for those amounts that a person issued a manufacturer's license under this section may charge for goods supplied or services rendered, the person holding the manufacturer's license may not be directly reimbursed by a holder of a gaming license for the cost of any fee paid by the person for the issuance or continuation of such a license, whether imposed under this section or any other provision of this chapter. (5) A manufacturer or distributor of associated equipment who sells, transfers or offers the associated equipment for use or play in Mississippi may be required by the executive director to file an application for a finding of suitability to be a manufacturer or distributor of associated equipment. Any person who directly or indirectly involves himself in the sale, transfer or offering for use or play in Mississippi of associated equipment who is not otherwise required to be licensed as a manufacturer or distributor may be required by the executive director to file an application for a finding of suitability to be a manufacturer or distributor of associated equipment. If an application for a finding of suitability is not submitted within thirty (30) days after demand by the executive director, he may pursue any remedy or combination of remedies provided in this chapter. (6) The executive director and his employees may inspect every gaming device which is manufactured, sold or distributed: (a) For use in this state, before the gaming device is put into play. (b) In this state for use outside this state, before the gaming device is shipped out of this state. The executive director may inspect every gaming device which is offered for play within this state by a licensee. The executive director may inspect all associated equipment which is manufactured, sold or distributed for use in this state before the equipment is installed or used by a gaming licensee. In addition to all other fees and charges imposed by this chapter, the executive director may determine an inspection fee with regard to each manufacturer, seller or distributor which must not exceed the actual cost of inspection and investigation.  Upon such determination, the executive director shall certify to the  * * *Chairman of the State Tax Commission Commissioner of Revenue the amount of the inspection fee and the name and address of the applicant.  Upon such certification the * * *State Tax Commission Department of Revenue shall proceed to assess and collect such inspection fee from the applicant. SECTION 18.  Section 75-76-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-76-101. (1)  All gaming must be conducted with chips, tokens or other instrumentalities approved by the executive director or with the legal tender of the United States. (2) Except for an online sports pool or online race book, no licensee shall permit participation by a person in a game conducted in the licensed gaming establishment if such person is not physically present in the licensed gaming establishment during the period of time when such game is being conducted, and all games and the participation of patrons therein shall be entirely located and conducted on the licensed premises. SECTION 19.  Section 75-76-175, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-76-175.  (1)  A credit instrument accepted on or after June 29, 1991, is valid and may be enforced by legal process. (2)  A licensee or a person acting on the licensee's behalf may accept an incomplete credit instrument which: (a)  Is signed by a patron; and (b)  States the amount of the debt in figures. Such licensee or person acting on the licensee's behalf * * *and may complete the instrument as is necessary for the instrument to be presented for payment. (3)  A licensee or person acting on behalf of a licensee: (a)  May accept a credit instrument that is dated later than the date of its execution if that later date is furnished at the time of the execution of the credit instrument by the patron. (b)  May not accept a credit instrument which is incomplete, except as authorized by subsection (2) of this section. (c)  May accept a credit instrument that is payable to an affiliated company or may complete a credit instrument in the name of an affiliated company as payee if the credit instrument otherwise complies with this subsection and the records of the affiliated company pertaining to the credit instrument are made available to the executive director upon request. (4)  This section does not prohibit the establishment of an account by a deposit of cash, recognized traveler's check, or any other instruments which is equivalent to cash. (5)  Any person who violates the provisions of this section is subject only to the penalties provided in Sections 75-76-103 through 75-76-119, inclusive. (6)  The commission may adopt regulations prescribing the conditions under which a credit instrument may be redeemed or presented to a bank for collection or payment. SECTION 20.  Section 75-76-177, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-76-177. (1)  From and after August 1, 1990, there is hereby imposed and levied on each gaming licensee a license fee based upon all the gross revenue of the licensee as follows: (a) Four percent (4%) of all the gross revenue of the licensee which does not exceed Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) per calendar month; (b) Six percent (6%) of all the gross revenue of the licensee which exceeds Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) per calendar month and does not exceed One Hundred Thirty four Thousand Dollars ($134,000.00) per calendar month; and (c) Eight percent (8%) of all the gross revenue of the licensee which exceeds One Hundred Thirty-four Thousand Dollars ($134,000.00) per calendar month through June 30, 2026, and six percent (6%) per calendar month thereafter. However, from and after July 1, 2026, for the portion of such gross revenue that is derived from sports pool or race book other than online sports pool or online race book, the rate of the fee shall be three and one-half percent (3.5%). (2) All revenue received from any game or gaming device which is leased for operation on the premises of the licensee owner to a person other than the owner thereof or which is located in an area or space on such premises which is leased by the licensee owner to any such person, must be attributed to the owner for the purposes of this section and be counted as part of the gross revenue of the owner.  The lessee is liable to the owner for his proportionate share of such license fees. (3) If the amount of license fees required to be reported and paid pursuant to this section is later determined to be greater or less than the amount actually reported and paid by the licensee, the Chairman of the State Tax shall: (a) Assess and collect the additional license fees  determined to be due, with interest thereon until paid; or (b) Refund any overpayment, with interest thereon, to the licensee. Interest must be computed, until paid, at the rate of one percent (1%) per month from the first day of the first month following either the due date of the additional license fees  or the date of overpayment. (4) Failure to pay the fees provided for in this section when they are due for continuation of a license shall be deemed a surrender of the license. (5)  Any licensee subject to the license fee under subsection (1)(c) of this section, as amended by this act, shall be required to reinvest an amount equal to the difference between the license fee derived as a result of the decrease to the rate of the fee as provided in this act compared to the rate of the license fee prior to reduction as provided in this act, into the physical infrastructure, marketing, and destination development of the licensed premises.  These funds shall be specifically used to: make properties more marketable as world-class destination gaming locations; drive out-of-state tourism through national marketing campaigns; and create new, permanent jobs within the hospitality and gaming sectors.  The commission shall audit compliance with this reinvestment requirement annually. SECTION 21.  Section 97-33-305, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 97-33-305. (1)  Fantasy contests are legal in this state.  A fantasy contest operator must comply with the provisions of this section if the operator's total player roster for all fantasy contests consists of one hundred (100) or more members of the general public. (2) A fantasy contest operator must implement commercially reasonable procedures for fantasy contests with an entry fee to: (a) Prevent employees of the operator, and relatives living in the same household with an employee of an operator, from competing in fantasy contests offered by an operator in which the operator offers a cash prize; (b) Prevent sharing with third parties of confidential information that could affect fantasy contest play until the information is made publicly available; (c) Prevent the operator from participating in a fantasy contest offered by the operator; (d) Verify that a fantasy contest player is eighteen (18) years of age or older except as required in Section 97-33-307(5); (e) Ensure that individuals who participate or officiate in a sporting event or who own, manage or coach a team or player who participates in a sporting event will not knowingly be allowed to enter a fantasy contest that is determined, in whole or in part, on accumulated statistical results that include a sporting event in which the individual could be involved as an athlete, official, owner, manager or coach; (f) Allow individuals to restrict themselves from entering a fantasy contest upon request and provide reasonable steps to prevent the person from entering fantasy contests offered by the operator; (g) Disclose the number of entries that a player may submit to each fantasy contest and provide reasonable steps to prevent players from submitting more than the allowable number; (h) Restrict the number of entries submitted by a single player for any contest as follows: (i) An operator shall not allow a player to submit more than one (1) entry in a contest involving twelve (12) or fewer players. (ii) If the number of players in a contest is more than twelve (12) but fewer than thirty seven (37), an operator shall not allow a player to submit more than two (2) entries. (iii) If the number of players in a contest is at least thirty seven (37) but no more than one hundred (100), an operator shall not allow a player to submit more than three (3) entries. (iv) In any contest involving more than one hundred (100) players, an operator shall not allow a player to submit more than the lesser of: 1. Three percent (3%) of all entries; or 2. One hundred fifty (150) entries. (v) For all advertised fantasy contests, the operator must prominently include information about the maximum number of entries that may be submitted for that contest. (vi) An operator may establish fantasy contests in which there is no restriction on the number of entries, if those contests constitute less than two percent (2%) of the total number of contests it offers, and if the operator clearly discloses: 1. That there are no limits on the number of entries by each player in the contest; and 2. That the cost of participating in such a contest is Fifty Dollars ($50.00) or more per entry; (i) Offer introductory procedures for players that are prominently displayed on the main page of the operator's platform to explain contest play and how to identify a highly experienced player; (j) Identify all highly experienced players in every fantasy contest by a symbol attached to the players' usernames, or by other easily visible means, on all platforms supported by the operator; and (k) Segregate fantasy contest player funds from operational funds or maintain a reserve in the form of cash, cash equivalents, payment processor reserves and receivables, an irrevocable letter of credit, a bond, or a combination thereof, in the amount of the total account balances of the fantasy contest players for the benefit and protection of the funds held in the accounts. (3) An operator shall not offer contests based on the performance of participants in collegiate, high school or youth sports events. (4) A fantasy contest operator offering fantasy contests with an entry fee in this state shall comply with audit procedures adopted by the commission to ensure compliance with this section. (5) (a)  Advertisements for contests and prizes offered by an operator shall not target prohibited participants, minors, or self excluded persons. (b) Representations or implications about average winnings from contests shall not be unfair or misleading.  Such representations shall include, at a minimum: (i) The median and mean net winnings of all players participating in contests offered by the operator; and (ii) The percentage of winnings awarded by the operator to highly experienced players participating in contests offered by the operator within the preceding calendar year. (6) Operators shall prohibit the use of third party scripts or scripting programs for any contest and ensure that measures are in place to deter, detect and, to the extent reasonably possible, prevent cheating, including collusion, and the use of cheating devices, including use of software programs that submit entry fees or adjust the athletes selected by a player. (7) The values of all prizes and awards offered to winning players must be established and made known to the players in advance of the contest. SECTION 22.  Section 97-33-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-33-27. If any person shall bet on a horse race or a yacht race or on a shooting match, he shall be fined not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), and, unless the fine and costs be immediately paid, he shall be imprisoned in the county jail not more than ninety (90) days; provided, however, this section shall not apply to betting, gaming or wagering: (a) On a cruise vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is in the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; (b) In a structure located in whole or in part on shore in any of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi in which the registered voters of the county have voted to allow such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79, if: (i) The structure is owned, leased or controlled by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, to conduct legal gaming on a cruise vessel under paragraph (a) of this section; (ii) The part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is located entirely in an area which is located no more than eight hundred (800) feet from the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) of the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, or, with regard to Harrison County only, no farther north than the southern boundary of the right-of-way for U.S. Highway 90, whichever is greater; and (iii) In the case of a structure that is located in whole or part on shore, the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted shall lie adjacent to state waters south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  When the site upon which the structure is located consists of a parcel of real property, easements and rights-of-way for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of the parcel, nor shall the footage contained within the easements and rights-of-way be counted in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii) * * *.; (c) On a vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is on the Mississippi River or navigable waters within any county bordering on the Mississippi River, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; or (d) That is legal under the laws of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 23.  Section 97-33-8, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-33-8. (1)  The provisions of this section are intended to clarify that the operation of "Internet sweepstakes cafes" is an illegal gambling activity under Mississippi state law. (2) It shall be unlawful for any person or entity to possess, own, control, display, operate or have a financial interest in an electronic video monitor that: (a) Is offered or made available to a person to play or participate in a simulated gambling program in return for direct or indirect consideration, including consideration associated with a product, service or activity other than the simulated gambling program; and (b) The person who plays or participates in the simulated gambling program may become eligible to win, redeem or otherwise obtain a cash or cash-equivalent prize, whether or not the eligibility for or value of the prize is determined by or has any relationship to the outcome or play of the program. (3) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed in this subsection, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a) "Simulated gambling program" means any method intended to be used by a person playing, participating or interacting with an electronic video monitor that is offered by another person or entity; that directly or indirectly implements the predetermination of a cash or cash-equivalent prize, or otherwise connects the player with the cash or cash-equivalent prize; and that is not legal under the Mississippi Gaming Control Act. (b) "Consideration associated with a product, service or activity other than the simulated gambling program" means money or other value collected for a product, service or activity that is offered in any direct or indirect relationship to playing or participating in the simulated gambling program. The term includes consideration paid for Internet access or computer time, or a sweepstakes entry. (c) "Electronic video monitor" means any unit, mechanism, computer or other terminal, or device that is capable of displaying moving or still images. (4) Any person or entity violating the provisions of this section, upon conviction, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and fined not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisoned for not less than one (1) year, or both. (5) The provisions of this section shall not apply to: (a) Any lawful activity that is conducted for the primary purpose of entertaining children under the age of eighteen (18) years, during which money is paid for a token or chip that is used to play an electronic or other game, with the winner of the game earning tickets that can be exchanged for prizes; (b) Any lawful marketing promotion, contest, prize or sweepstakes that is designed to attract consumer attention to a specific product or service which is offered for sale by the manufacturer, distributor, vendor or retailer of the product or service; or (c) Any promotional activity as defined in Section 75-76-5 that is conducted by a gaming licensee. SECTION 24.  Section 97-33-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-33-25. If any person shall sell or buy, either directly or indirectly, any chance in what is commonly called pool, upon any event whatever, or shall in any manner engage in such business or pastime, he shall be fined not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or shall be imprisoned in the county jail not more than ninety (90) days; provided, however, this section shall not apply to betting, gaming or wagering: (a) On a cruise vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is in the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; (b) In a structure located in whole or in part on shore in any of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi in which the registered voters of the county have voted to allow such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79, if: (i) The structure is owned, leased or controlled by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, to conduct legal gaming on a cruise vessel under paragraph (a) of this section; (ii) The part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is located entirely in an area which is located no more than eight hundred (800) feet from the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) of the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, or, with regard to Harrison County only, no farther north than the southern boundary of the right-of-way for U.S. Highway 90, whichever is greater; and (iii) In the case of a structure that is located in whole or part on shore, the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted shall lie adjacent to state waters south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  When the site upon which the structure is located consists of a parcel of real property, easements and rights-of-way for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of the parcel, nor shall the footage contained within the easements and rights-of-way be counted in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii) * * *.; (c) On a vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is on the Mississippi River or navigable waters within any county bordering on the Mississippi River, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; or (d) That is legal under the laws of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 25.  Section 97-33-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 97-33-1. Except as otherwise provided in Section 97-33-8, if any person shall encourage, promote or play at any game, play or amusement, other than a fight or fighting match between dogs, for money or other valuable thing, or shall wager or bet, promote or encourage the wagering or betting of any money or other valuable things, upon any game, play, amusement, cockfight, Indian ball play or duel, other than a fight or fighting match between dogs, or upon the result of any election, event or contingency whatever, upon conviction thereof, he shall be fined in a sum not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00); and, unless such fine and costs be immediately paid, shall be imprisoned for any period not more than ninety (90) days.  However, this section shall not apply to betting, gaming or wagering: (a) On a cruise vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is in the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; (b) In a structure located, in whole or in part, on shore in any of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi in which the registered voters of the county have voted to allow such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79, if: (i) The structure is owned, leased or controlled by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, to conduct legal gaming on a cruise vessel under paragraph (a) of this section; (ii) The part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is located entirely in an area which is located no more than eight hundred (800) feet from the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) of the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, or, with regard to Harrison County only, no farther north than the southern boundary of the right-of-way for U.S. Highway 90, whichever is greater; and (iii) In the case of a structure that is located in whole or part on shore, the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted shall lie adjacent to state waters south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  When the site upon which the structure is located consists of a parcel of real property, easements and rights-of-way for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of the parcel, nor shall the footage contained within the easements and rights-of-way be counted in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii); (c) On a vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is on the Mississippi River or navigable waters within any county bordering on the Mississippi River, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; or (d) That is legal under the laws of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 26.  Section 97-33-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 97-33-7. (1)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 97-33-8, it shall be unlawful for any person or persons, firm, copartnership or corporation to have in possession, own, control, display, or operate any cane rack, knife rack, artful dodger, punch board, roll down, merchandise wheel, slot machine, pinball machine, or similar device or devices.  Provided, however, that this section shall not be so construed as to make unlawful the ownership, possession, control, display or operation of any antique coin machine as defined in Section 27-27-12, or any music machine or bona fide automatic vending machine where the purchaser receives exactly the same quantity of merchandise on each operation of said machine.  Any slot machine other than an antique coin machine as defined in Section 27-27-12 which delivers, or is so constructed as that by operation thereof it will deliver to the operator thereof anything of value in varying quantities, in addition to the merchandise received, and any slot machine other than an antique coin machine as defined in Section 27-27-12 that is constructed in such manner as that slugs, tokens, coins or similar devices are, or may be, used and delivered to the operator thereof in addition to merchandise of any sort contained in such machine, is hereby declared to be a gambling device, and shall be deemed unlawful under the provisions of this section.  Provided, however, that pinball machines which do not return to the operator or player thereof anything but free additional games or plays shall not be deemed to be gambling devices, and neither this section nor any other law shall be construed to prohibit same. (2) No property right shall exist in any person, natural or artificial, or be vested in such person, in any or all of the devices described herein that are not exempted from the provisions of this section; and all such devices are hereby declared to be at all times subject to confiscation and destruction, and their possession shall be unlawful, except when in the possession of officers carrying out the provisions of this section.  It shall be the duty of all law enforcing officers to seize and immediately destroy all such machines and devices. (3) A first violation of the provisions of this section shall be deemed a misdemeanor, and the party offending shall, upon conviction, be fined in any sum not exceeding Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or imprisoned not exceeding three (3) months, or both, in the discretion of the court.  In the event of a second conviction for a violation of any of the provisions of this section, the party offending shall be subject to a sentence of not less than six (6) months in the county jail, nor more than two (2) years in the State Penitentiary, in the discretion of the trial court. (4) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, it shall not be unlawful to operate any equipment or device described in subsection (1) of this section or any gaming, gambling or similar device or devices by whatever name called while: (a) On a cruise vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is in the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; (b) In a structure located, in whole or in part, on shore in any of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi in which the registered voters of the county have voted to allow such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79, if: (i) The structure is owned, leased or controlled by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, to conduct legal gaming on a cruise vessel under paragraph (a) of this subsection; (ii) The part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is located entirely in an area which is located no more than eight hundred (800) feet from the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) of the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, or, with regard to Harrison County only, no farther north than the southern boundary of the right-of-way for U.S. Highway 90, whichever is greater; and (iii) In the case of a structure that is located in whole or part on shore, the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted shall lie adjacent to state waters south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  When the site upon which the structure is located consists of a parcel of real property, easements and rights-of-way for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of the parcel, nor shall the footage contained within the easements and rights-of-way be counted in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii); (c) On a vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is on the Mississippi River or navigable waters within any county bordering on the Mississippi River, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; or (d) That is legal under the laws of the State of Mississippi. (5) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, it shall not be unlawful (a) to own, possess, repair or control any gambling device, machine or equipment in a licensed gaming establishment or on the business premises appurtenant to any such licensed gaming establishment during any period of time in which such licensed gaming establishment is being constructed, repaired, maintained or operated in this state; (b) to install any gambling device, machine or equipment in any licensed gaming establishment; (c) to possess or control any gambling device, machine or equipment during the process of procuring or transporting such device, machine or equipment for installation on any such licensed gaming establishment; or (d) to store in a warehouse or other storage facility any gambling device, machine, equipment, or part thereof, regardless of whether the county or municipality in which the warehouse or storage facility is located has approved gaming aboard cruise vessels or vessels, provided that such device, machine or equipment is operated only in a county or municipality that has approved gaming aboard cruise vessels or vessels.  Any gambling device, machine or equipment that is owned, possessed, controlled, installed, procured, repaired, transported or stored in accordance with this subsection shall not be subject to confiscation, seizure or destruction, and any person, firm, partnership or corporation which owns, possesses, controls, installs, procures, repairs, transports or stores any gambling device, machine or equipment in accordance with this subsection shall not be subject to any prosecution or penalty under this section.  Any person constructing or repairing such cruise vessels or vessels within a municipality shall comply with all municipal ordinances protecting the general health or safety of the residents of the municipality. SECTION 27.  Section 7-11-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 7-11-11. The Secretary of State shall have charge of the swamp and the overflowed lands and indemnity lands in lieu thereof, the internal improvement lands, the lands forfeited to the state for nonpayment of taxes after the time allowed by law for redemption shall have expired, and of all other public lands belonging to or under the control of the state.  The regulation, sale and disposition of all such lands shall be made through the Secretary of State's office. The Secretary of State shall sign all conveyances and leases of any and all state-owned lands and shall record same in a book kept in his office for such purposes. SECTION 28.  Section 29-1-107, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 29-1-107. (1)  The Secretary of State with the approval of the Governor shall, as far as practicable, rent or lease all lands belonging to the state, except as otherwise provided by law for a period of not exceeding one (1) year, and account for the rents therefrom in the same manner as money received from the sale of state lands, provided that no state land shall be rented or leased to individuals, corporations, partnerships, or association of persons for hunting or fishing purposes.  Property belonging to the state in municipalities, even though it may have been subdivided into lots, blocks, divisions, or otherwise escheated or was sold to the state by such description, may likewise be leased or rented by the Secretary of State under the terms provided above for other state lands, and the rents accounted for in the same manner.  The state shall have all the liens, rights and remedies accorded to landlords in Sections 89-7-1 through 89-7-125; said leases and rental contracts shall automatically terminate on the date provided in said leases or contracts. (2) (a)  The Secretary of State, with the approval of the Governor, may rent or lease surface lands, tidelands or submerged lands owned or controlled by the State of Mississippi lying in or adjacent to the Mississippi Sound or Gulf of Mexico or streams emptying therein, for a period not exceeding forty (40) years for rental payable to the state annually.  However, the term of any lease of state public trust tidelands to a person possessing a license under the Mississippi Gaming Control Act shall be governed by the provisions of subsection (4) of this section. (b) The lessee under such agreement may construct such necessary items for marking channels, docking, wharfing, mooring or fleeting vessels which shall be in aid of navigation and not obstructions thereto. (c) A lessee of record may be given the option to renew for an additional period not to exceed twenty-five (25) years; however, the term of a renewal for a lease of state public trust tidelands to a person possessing a gaming license under the Mississippi Gaming Control Act shall be governed by the provisions of subsection (4) of this section.  The holder of a lease of Public Trust Tidelands, at the expiration thereof, shall have a prior right, exclusive of all other persons, to re-lease as may be agreed upon between the holder of the lease and the Secretary of State. (d) Leases shall provide for review and rent adjustments at each fifth anniversary tied either to the All Urban Consumer Price Index-All Items (CPI) or to an appraisal which deducts the value of any improvements by the lessee which substantially enhance the value of the land. In the case where the initial rental was based on the value set by the ad valorem tax rolls, then the rent review and adjustment clause shall be likewise based on the value set by such tax rolls.  In the event that the lessor and lessee cannot agree on a rental amount, the lease may be cancelled at the option of the lessor.  The lessee shall, within thirty (30) days after execution of a sublease or assignment, file a copy thereof, including the total consideration therefor, with the Secretary of State.  This paragraph shall not apply to a lease of state public trust tidelands or submerged lands to a person possessing a gaming license under the Mississippi Gaming Control Act who operates a gaming establishment on such tidelands. (3) Provided, however, the current occupants of public trust tidelands that were developed after the determinable mean high-water line nearest the effective date of the Coastal Wetlands Protection Law shall pay an annual rental based on the fair market value as determined by the assessed valuation of the property. The holder of a lease of Public Trust Tidelands, at the expiration thereof, shall have a prior right, exclusive of all other persons, to re-lease as may be agreed upon between the holder of the lease and the Secretary of State. (4) (a)  This section shall apply to any person possessing a license under the Mississippi Gaming Control Act who operates a gaming establishment in any of the three (3) most southern counties of the state. (b) The following shall apply to all leases of state public trust tidelands executed by such a licensee: (i) Every lease executed after August 29, 2005, shall be for a period of thirty (30) years for rental payable to the state annually. (ii) By operation of this section, any lease executed before August 29, 2005, may, at the option of the lessee, either remain at the term stated in the original execution of the lease or be converted to a thirty-year term lease, beginning on such date after August 29, 2005, that the lessee either resumes or begins permanent gaming activities as approved by the Mississippi Gaming Commission, and the lessee shall be required to comply with all other provisions of the lease.  Should the lessee choose to operate in a structure that is not on state public trust tidelands and that is on property contiguous to tidelands leased by the lessee, the lessee shall be required to comply with all other provisions of the lease and shall be exempt from the assessment provided for in paragraph (c) of this subsection.  Easements for and rights-of-way for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of a parcel of property.  In the event that a lessee does not elect either to remain bound by the original term of the lease or to convert the lease to a thirty-year term, the Secretary of State may lease the state public trust tidelands that are the subject of the lease to any other person or entity. (iii) Leases shall provide for review and rent adjustments at each annual anniversary tied to the All Urban Consumer Price Index-All Items (CPI).  In the case of the renewal of a lease after the expiration of the original thirty-year term under this subsection, each renewal shall be for a term of thirty (30) years.  The base rate to which the CPI shall apply for purposes of executing the subsequent lease shall be negotiated by the lessee with the Secretary of State. (c) (i)  Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, any person possessing a license under the Mississippi Gaming Control Act who does not lease public trust tidelands from the state or any of its political subdivisions, and who operates a gaming establishment in any of the three (3) most southern counties of the state, shall pay an annual in-lieu tidelands assessment to the Public Trust Tidelands Assessments Fund (hereinafter referred to as "fund") created in Section 29-15-10, in the amount and manner provided for in this paragraph. For calendar year 2006, the annual in-lieu tidelands assessment paid by the licensee to the fund shall be: 1. Four Hundred Thousand Dollars ($400,000.00), if the capital investment in the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) or less. 2. Four Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($450,000.00), if the capital investment in the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is equal to or more than Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) but less than Sixty Million Dollars ($60,000,000.00). 3. Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00), if the capital investment in the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is equal to or more than Sixty Million Dollars ($60,000,000.00) but less than Seventy-five Million Dollars ($75,000,000.00). 4. Six Hundred Thousand Dollars ($600,000.00), if the capital investment in the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is equal to or more than Seventy-five Million Dollars ($75,000,000.00) but less than One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00). 5. Seven Hundred Thousand Dollars ($700,000.00), if the capital investment in the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is equal to or more than One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00) but less than One Hundred Twenty-five Million Dollars ($125,000,000.00). 6. Seven Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($750,000.00), if the capital investment in the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is equal to or more than One Hundred Twenty-five Million Dollars ($125,000,000.00). For each calendar year thereafter, the Secretary of State shall review and adjust the value of the capital investment and the annual in-lieu tidelands assessment due.  Such review and adjustment shall be tied to the CPI. (ii) This paragraph shall not apply to a gaming licensee if the licensee conducts gaming in a structure that is located on property that is leased from the Mississippi State Port at Gulfport or any political subdivision of the state, or to a licensee who conducts gaming in a structure that is located on property that is leased to the licensee jointly by the State of Mississippi and the City of Biloxi; however, with regard to property owned by a political subdivision of the state, this exception shall only apply to property owned by the political subdivision on August 29, 2005, if legal gaming could have been conducted on such property on that date. (iii) This paragraph shall not apply to a gaming licensee if the licensee conducts gaming in a structure that is located on property that is not leased from the State of Mississippi and/or a political subdivision of the State of Mississippi and is not on state public trust tidelands, and if the licensee conducted gaming on that property before August 29, 2005. SECTION 29.  Section 29-15-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 29-15-1. (a)  "Commission" means the Mississippi Commission on Marine Resources. (b) "Local tidal datum" means the datum established for a specific tide station through the use of tidal observations made at that station. (c) "Mean high water" means the arithmetic mean of all the high waters occurring in a particular nineteen-year tidal epoch period; or for a shorter period of time after corrections are applied to the short term observations to reduce these values to the equivalent nineteen-year value. (d) "Mean high water line" means the intersection of the tidal datum plane of mean high water with the shore. (e) "Mean high water survey" means a survey of the intersection of the shoreline with the tidal datum plane of mean high water using local tidal datums and surveying methodologies approved by the commission.  Methodologies shall include but not be limited to the "staking method," "the topographic method" and "tide coordinated aerial photography." (f) "National map accuracy standards" means a set of guidelines published by the Office of Management and Budget of the United States to which maps produced by the United States government adhere. (g) "Submerged lands" means lands which remain covered by waters, where the tides ebb and flow, at ordinary low tides. (h) "Tidelands" means those lands which are daily covered and uncovered by water by the action of the tides, up to the mean line of the ordinary high tides. SECTION 30.  Section 29-15-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 29-15-3. (1)  It is declared to be the public policy of this state to favor the preservation of the natural state of the public trust tidelands and their ecosystems and to prevent the despoliation and destruction of them, except where a specific alteration of specific public trust tidelands would serve a higher public interest in compliance with the public purposes of the public trust in which such tidelands are held. (2) It is hereby declared to be a higher public purpose of this state and the public tidelands trust to resolve the uncertainty and disputes which have arisen as to the location of the boundary between the state's public trust tidelands and the upland property and to confirm the mean high water boundary line as determined by the Mississippi Supreme Court, the laws of this state and this chapter. SECTION 31.  Section 29-15-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 29-15-5. (1)  Tidelands and submerged lands are held by the state in trust for use of all the people, and are so held in their character as the beds and shores of the sea and its tidally affected arms and tributaries for the purposes defined by common law and statutory law.  Littoral and riparian property owners have common law and statutory rights under the Coastal Wetlands Protection Law which extend into the waters and beyond the low tide line, and the state's responsibilities as trustee extends to such owners as well as to the other members of the public. (2) Residential property owners shall not be required to obtain a tidelands lease for exercising their common law and statutory littoral and riparian rights. SECTION 32.  Section 29-15-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 29-15-9. (1)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the "Public Trust Tidelands Fund."  The fund shall be administered by the Secretary of State as trustee. (2) Any funds derived from lease rentals of tidelands and submerged lands, except those funds derived from mineral leases, or funds previously specifically designated to be applied to other agencies, shall be transferred to the special fund.  However, funds derived from lease rentals may be used to cover the administrative cost incurred by the Secretary of State.  Any remaining funds derived from lease rentals shall be disbursed pro rata to the local taxing authorities for the replacement of lost ad valorem taxes, if any.  Then, any remaining funds shall be disbursed to the commission for new and extra programs of tidelands management, such as conservation, reclamation, preservation, acquisition, education or the enhancement of public access to the public trust tidelands or public improvement projects as they relate to those lands. (3) Any funds that are appropriated as separate line items in an appropriation bill for tideland programs or projects authorized under this section for political subdivisions or other agencies shall be disbursed as provided in this subsection. (a) The Department of Marine Resources shall make progress payments in installments based on the work completed and material used in the performance of a tidelands project only after receiving written verification from the political subdivision or agency.  The political subdivision or agency shall submit verification of the work completed or materials in such detail and form that the department may require. (b) The Department of Marine Resources shall make funds available for the purpose of using such funds as a match or leverage for federal or other funds that are available for the designated tidelands project. SECTION 33.  Section 29-15-10, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 29-15-10. (1)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the "Public Trust Tidelands Assessments Fund."  The purpose of the fund is to ensure that monies derived from the public trust tidelands assessments shall be used for the benefit of preserving and protecting the tidelands and submerged lands found within the three (3) most southern counties of the state.  One (1) specific purpose of the fund is to ensure that the annual payment made by the state for the purchase of Deer Island shall continue uninterrupted until the purchase transaction is completed.  The fund shall be administered by the Secretary of State, as trustee.  None of the funds that are in the special fund or that are required to be deposited into the special fund shall be transferred, diverted or in any other manner expended or used for any purpose other than those purposes specified in this section. (2) (a)  Any funds derived from assessments made pursuant to Section 29-1-107(4)(c) shall be deposited into the special fund. (b) Funds paid pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection may be appropriated by the Legislature in an amount necessary to cover the administrative cost incurred by the Mississippi Commission on Marine Resources.  Any remaining funds shall be disbursed by the commission for new and extra programs of tidelands management, such as conservation, reclamation, preservation, acquisition, education or the enhancement of public access to the public trust tidelands or public improvement projects as they relate to those lands. (3) Any funds that are appropriated as separate line items in an appropriation bill for tideland programs or projects authorized under this section for political subdivisions or other agencies shall be disbursed as provided in this subsection. (a) The Department of Marine Resources shall make progress payments in installments based on the work completed and material used in the performance of a tidelands project only after receiving written verification from the political subdivision or agency.  The political subdivision or agency shall submit verification of the work completed or materials in such detail and form that the department may require. (b) The Department of Marine Resources shall make funds available for the purpose of using such funds as a match or leverage for federal or other funds that are available for the designated tidelands project. SECTION 34.  Section 29-15-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 29-15-13. All public projects of any federal, state or local governmental entity which serve a higher public purpose of promoting the conservation, reclamation, preservation of the tidelands and submerged lands, public use for fishing, recreation or navigation, or the enhancement of public access to such lands shall be exempt from any use or rental fees. SECTION 35.  Section 59-7-405, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-405. (1)  (a)  The governing authorities of any municipality in which there is situated and located, in whole or in part, a port or harbor through which commerce flows, and having not less than eight (8) industries engaged in the seafood industry, which maintains a channel and/or harbor to a depth of not less than eight (8) feet, may engage in, either directly or through the commission hereinafter provided and designated, and such other agencies as hereafter may be provided by law, works of internal improvement, or promoting, developing, constructing, maintaining and operating harbors or seaports within the state and its jurisdiction, and either directly or through the commission hereinafter provided for, with the power and authority to acquire, purchase, install, rent, lease, mortgage and/or otherwise encumber, to construct, own, hold, maintain, equip, use, control and operate at seaports or harbors, wharves, piers, docks, warehouses, cold storage facilities, water and rail terminals, airplane landing fields and strips, and other structures and facilities, needful for the convenient use of the same in the aid of commerce and navigation, and including the dredging of channels and approaches to the facilities, and being authorized to fill in and reclaim bottomlands where incidental and necessary to the foregoing development. (b) A municipality, which is operating a port through a port commission under this section, may dissolve the port commission as provided in Section 59-7-408 and directly operate and maintain the port as provided under this article. (2) The municipal authorities or commission, in connection with the exercise of the foregoing works of improvement and development, may as an adjunct to any such work of improvement or development to erect or construct such bridges, causeways or structures as may be required for access to and from the harbors or facilities provided as aforesaid by the municipal authorities or the commission, and including any necessary bridge or causeway or combination of the same, connecting with any island or islands lying within three (3) leagues of the main shoreline of the Mississippi Sound or the Gulf of Mexico, and whether the same be within or without the limits of the municipality concerned. (3) The municipal authorities or commission may procure, by gift, grant, purchase, or by the exercise of eminent domain, and for the public purposes and uses herein provided for, such land or interest therein as may be required for the purposes of this article, and regardless of whether the land be within or without the limits of the municipality involved. (4) The municipal authorities or commission, in the exercise of the powers granted hereunder, may provide any of the aforesaid facilities alone or in collaboration and in conjunction with any other public bodies, entities or commissions, as may now or hereafter be established by law. (5) The municipal authorities or commission may provide, among other harbor facilities, small craft and pleasure craft harbors and facilities needed therefor, including park and recreational facilities as an adjunct thereto, and in order to develop and promote tourist and recreational trade in the port. (6) The municipal authorities or commission have the power and authority to carry out the provisions of this article, to employ engineers, attorneys, and such employees as may be necessary in carrying out the provisions of this article, from time to time, and for the purpose of operating the facilities herein provided for, and may prescribe reasonable compensation in connection with such employment. SECTION 36.  Section 59-15-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 59-15-1. The authorities of any city in this state which has a population of ten thousand (10,000) or more, according to the last official government census, and the authorities of any municipality bordering on the Mississippi Sound or Gulf of Mexico are hereby given the authority to acquire by purchase, deed, donation, gift, grant, reclamation, lease, dedication, or otherwise, land, harbor sites or water frontage for the purpose of establishing, developing, promoting, maintaining, and operating harbors for small water crafts and recreational parks connected therewith within its territorial limits, or both, and shall have the power to acquire, purchase, install, rent, lease, mortgage, incumber, construct, own, hold, maintain, equip, use, control and operate recreational parks and harbors for small water craft. SECTION 37.  Section 75-76-67, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 75-76-67. (1)  Any person who the commission determines is qualified to receive a license or be found suitable under the provisions of this chapter, having due consideration for the proper protection of the health, safety, morals, good order and general welfare of the inhabitants of the State of Mississippi and the declared policy of this state, may be issued a state gaming license or found suitable.  The burden of proving his qualification to receive any license or be found suitable is on the applicant. (2) An application to receive a license or be found suitable shall not be granted unless the commission is satisfied that the applicant is: (a) A person of good character, honesty and integrity; (b) A person whose prior activities, criminal record, if any, reputation, habits and associations do not pose a threat to the public interest of this state or to the effective regulation and control of gaming, or create or enhance the dangers of unsuitable, unfair or illegal practices, methods and activities in the conduct of gaming or the carrying on of the business and financial arrangements incidental thereto; and (c) In all other respects qualified to be licensed or found suitable consistent with the declared laws of the state. (3) No person shall be granted a license or found suitable under the provisions of this chapter who has been convicted of a felony in any court of this state, another state, or the United States; and no person shall be granted a license or found suitable hereunder who has been convicted of a crime in any court of another state or the United States which, if committed in this state, would be a felony; and no person shall be granted a license or found suitable under the provisions of this chapter who has been convicted of a misdemeanor in any court of this state or of another state, when such conviction was for gambling, sale of alcoholic beverages to minors, prostitution, or procuring or inducing individuals to engage in prostitution. (4) A license to operate a gaming establishment shall not be granted unless the applicant has satisfied the commission that: (a) He has adequate business probity, competence and experience, in gaming or generally; and (b) The proposed financing of the entire operation is: (i) Adequate for the nature of the proposed operation; and (ii) From a suitable source.  Any lender or other source of money or credit which the commission finds does not meet the standards set forth in subsection (2) may be deemed unsuitable. (5) An application to receive a license or be found suitable constitutes a request for a determination of the applicant's general character, integrity and ability to participate or engage in, or be associated with gaming.  Any written or oral statement made in the course of an official proceeding of the commission or the executive director or any witness testifying under oath which is relevant to the purpose of the proceeding is absolutely privileged and does not impose liability for defamation or constitute a ground for recovery in any civil action. (6) The commission may, in its discretion, grant a license to a corporation which has complied with the provisions of this chapter. (7) The commission may, in its discretion, grant a license to a limited partnership which has complied with the provisions of this chapter. (8) No limited partnership, except one whose sole limited partner is a publicly traded corporation which has registered with the commission, or business trust or organization or other association of a quasi-corporate character is eligible to receive or hold any license under this chapter unless all persons having any direct or indirect interest therein of any nature whatsoever, whether financial, administrative, policymaking or supervisory, are individually qualified to be licensed under the provisions of this chapter. (9) The commission may, by regulation, limit the number of persons who may be financially interested and the nature of their interest in any corporation or other organization or association licensed under this chapter, and may establish such other qualifications of licenses as the commission, in its discretion, deems to be in the public interest and consistent with the declared policy of the state. SECTION 38.  Section 87-1-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 87-1-5. If any person, by playing at any game whatever, or by betting on the sides or hands of such as do play at any game, or by betting on any horse race or cockfight, or at any other sport or pastime, or by any wager whatever, shall lose any money, property, or other valuable thing, real or personal, and shall pay or deliver the same or any part thereof, the person so losing and paying or delivering the same, or his wife or children, may sue for and recover such money, property, or other valuable thing so lost and paid or delivered, or any part thereof, from the person knowingly receiving the same, with costs. However, this section shall not apply to betting, gaming or wagering: (a) On a cruise vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is in the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay; (b) In a structure located in whole or in part on shore in any of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi in which the registered voters of the county have voted to allow such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79, if: (i) The structure is owned, leased or controlled by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, to conduct legal gaming on a cruise vessel under paragraph (a) of this section; (ii) The part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is located entirely in an area which is located no more than eight hundred (800) feet from the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) of the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, or, with regard to Harrison County only, no farther north than the southern boundary of the right-of-way for U.S. Highway 90, whichever is greater; and (iii) In the case of a structure that is located in whole or part on shore, the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted shall lie adjacent to state waters south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  When the site upon which the structure is located consists of a parcel of real property, easements and rights-of-way for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of the parcel, nor shall the footage contained within the easements and rights-of-way be counted in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii) * * *.; (c) On a vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is on the Mississippi River or navigable waters within any county bordering on the Mississippi River; or (d) That is legal under the laws of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 39.  Section 97-33-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-33-25. If any person shall sell or buy, either directly or indirectly, any chance in what is commonly called pool, upon any event whatever, or shall in any manner engage in such business or pastime, he shall be fined not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or shall be imprisoned in the county jail not more than ninety (90) days; provided, however, this section shall not apply to betting, gaming or wagering: (a) On a cruise vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is in the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; (b) In a structure located in whole or in part on shore in any of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi in which the registered voters of the county have voted to allow such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79, if: (i) The structure is owned, leased or controlled by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, to conduct legal gaming on a cruise vessel under paragraph (a) of this section; (ii) The part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is located entirely in an area which is located no more than eight hundred (800) feet from the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) of the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, or, with regard to Harrison County only, no farther north than the southern boundary of the right-of-way for U.S. Highway 90, whichever is greater; and (iii) In the case of a structure that is located in whole or part on shore, the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted shall lie adjacent to state waters south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  When the site upon which the structure is located consists of a parcel of real property, easements and rights-of-way for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of the parcel, nor shall the footage contained within the easements and rights-of-way be counted in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii) * * *.; (c) On a vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is on the Mississippi River or navigable waters within any county bordering on the Mississippi River, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; or (d) That is legal under the laws of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 40.  Section 97-33-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-33-27. If any person shall bet on a horse race or a yacht race or on a shooting match, he shall be fined not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), and, unless the fine and costs be immediately paid, he shall be imprisoned in the county jail not more than ninety (90) days; provided, however, this section shall not apply to betting, gaming or wagering: (a) On a cruise vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is in the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; (b) In a structure located in whole or in part on shore in any of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi in which the registered voters of the county have voted to allow such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79, if: (i) The structure is owned, leased or controlled by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, to conduct legal gaming on a cruise vessel under paragraph (a) of this section; (ii) The part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is located entirely in an area which is located no more than eight hundred (800) feet from the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) of the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, or, with regard to Harrison County only, no farther north than the southern boundary of the right-of-way for U.S. Highway 90, whichever is greater; and (iii) In the case of a structure that is located in whole or part on shore, the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted shall lie adjacent to state waters south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  When the site upon which the structure is located consists of a parcel of real property, easements and rights-of-way for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of the parcel, nor shall the footage contained within the easements and rights-of-way be counted in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii) * * *.; (c) On a vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is on the Mississippi River or navigable waters within any county bordering on the Mississippi River, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; or (d) That is legal under the laws of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 41.  Section 43-19-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-19-31.  The Department of Human Services is hereby authorized and empowered to establish a single and separate Child Support Unit for the following purposes: (a)  To develop and implement a nonsupport and paternity program and institute proceedings in the name of the Department of Human Services or in the name of the recipient in any court of competent jurisdiction in any county where the mother of the child resides or is found, in the county where the father resides or is found, or in the county where the child resides or is found; (b)  To secure and collect support by any method authorized under state law and establish paternity for any child or children receiving aid from the department any form of public assistance, including, but not limited to, medical assistance, foster care, food stamps, TANF, or any other program under the federal Social Security Act, from a parent or any other person legally liable for such support who has either failed or refused to provide support, deserted, neglected or abandoned the child or children, including cooperating with other states in establishing paternity, locating absent parents and securing compliance with court orders for support of Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) children; the department may petition the court for the inclusion of health insurance as part of any child support order on behalf of any child receiving aid from the department unless good cause for noncooperation, as defined by the Social Security Act or the Mississippi Department of Human Services, is established.  Unless notified to the contrary, whenever a child or children for whom child support services have been provided ceases to receive public assistance, the department will continue to provide services and establish paternity, secure and collect such support payments from a parent or any other person legally liable for such support in accordance with the standards prescribed pursuant to the federal Social Security Act; (c)  To accept applications for child support enforcement services to establish paternity, secure and collect support from any proper party or person as defined by Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act notwithstanding the fact that the child or children do not currently receive or have never received public assistance. The department shall have the authority to secure and collect support by any method authorized under state law and establish paternity for any child or children on behalf of a recipient of child support services, including individuals who do not currently receive or have never received public assistance from a parent or any other person legally liable for such support who has either failed or refused to provide support, deserted, neglected or abandoned the child or children, including cooperating with other states in establishing paternity, locating absent parents and securing compliance with court orders for support; the department may petition the court for the inclusion of health insurance as part of any child support order on behalf of such recipients of child support services.  The proceeds of any collections resulting from such application shall be distributed in accordance with the standards prescribed in the federal Social Security Act; (d)  The department shall seek to recover from the individual who owes a support obligation to any individual who is a recipient of Title IV-D services as set forth in paragraph (b) or (c) on whose behalf the department is providing services, upon judicial proceedings conducted thereon after advance notice to such obligor, reasonable attorney's fees and court costs, in excess of any administrative fees collected and in excess of amounts of current support owed by the obligor, which the department incurs in recovering and collecting the support obligation, such costs and fees as the department recovers to be deposited in the Special Fund of the Mississippi Department of Human Services which is hereby established for the pursuit and collection of child support; (e)  To initiate contempt of court proceedings or any other remedial proceedings necessary to enforce (i) any order or decree of court relating to child support, and (ii) any order or decree of court relating to the maintenance and/or alimony of a parent where support collection services on his or her child's behalf are being provided by the department; (f)  To secure and collect by any method authorized under state law any maintenance and/or alimony on behalf of a parent whose child or children's support is being collected by the department.  The department shall collect only such maintenance and/or alimony as is ordered or decreed by the court, and only in the event that the minor child and parent to whom such maintenance and/or alimony has been ordered are living in the same household; (g)  To obtain restitution of monies expended for public assistance from a parent or any other person legally liable for the support of any child or children receiving aid from the department; said action for restitution shall arise from the payment of public assistance for the dependent child or children and shall be for the amount of the public assistance paid.  Said  action for restitution shall not arise against the parent or other person legally responsible who receives public assistance for the benefit of any dependent child or children.  When a court order of support has been issued, the amount recoverable shall be limited to the amount of the court order; (h)  Setting off against a debtor's income tax refund or rebate any debt which is in the form of a liquidated sum due and owing for the care, support or maintenance of a child; (i)  To have full responsibility in the aforementioned cases for initiating actions under the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act and for responding to the actions of other jurisdictions under said law when Mississippi is the responding state; however, this shall not impair private litigants' rights to proceed under any applicable interstate enforcement mechanisms; (j)  To enter into contracts for the purpose of performing any test which the department may, from time to time, require; (k)  To maintain a Central Receipting and Disbursement Unit to which all payments required by withholding orders and orders for support in all actions to which the Department of Human Services is a party shall be forwarded, and from which child support payments ordered by the court in actions to which the Department of Human Services is a party shall be disbursed to the custodial parent or other such party as may be designated by the court order.  The Central Receipting and Disbursement Unit shall be operated by the Department of Human Services or any financial institution having operations and qualified to do business in Mississippi, whose deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.  The department shall conduct cost-benefit analyses to determine and utilize the more cost efficient manner of operating the unit; (l)  To maintain a Mississippi Department of Human Services Case Registry containing records with respect to: (i)  Each case in which services are being provided by the department under this section; (ii)  Each support order established or modified in Mississippi on or after October 1, 1998; and (iii)  The Administrative Office of Courts, as established by Section 9-21-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, in consultation with the Mississippi Department of Human Services, shall devise, promulgate and require the use of a Uniform Child Support Order Tracking System. 1. Information collected from case filing forms shall be furnished to the Mississippi Department of Human Services, Division of Child Support Enforcement, in order that compliance with court-ordered obligations of support may be tracked with specificity throughout the duration of said obligations and any subsequent proceedings. 2.  Such tracking system shall include:  a. the names, residential and mailing addresses, telephone numbers, Social Security numbers, driver's license numbers and dates of birth of each child and parent named in or subject to the court order; b. the court cause number of the action; c. name, address and telephone number of employer; d. any restraining or protective order indicating domestic violence; and e. any other information which may be used for the purpose of identifying any person named in or subject to the order or for the purposes of establishing, enforcing or modifying a child support order; (m)  To take administrative actions relating to genetic testing, determine paternity, establish child support orders, modification of child support orders, income withholding, liens and subpoenas without the necessity of obtaining an order from any judicial or other administrative tribunal with respect to cases initiated or enforced by the department pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act; (n)  To have the authority to use high-volume automated administrative enforcement in interstate cases to the same extent as used for intrastate cases, in response to a request made by another state to enforce support orders; (o)  To provide any child support enforcement or other service as may be required by the United States of America, Department of Health and Human Services, Family Support Administration, Office of Child Support Enforcement or their successor pursuant to federal law or regulation; * * *and (p)  To collaborate with the Office of the State Treasurer in order to identify persons presumed to have unclaimed property and intercept eligible unclaimed property to satisfy, fully or partially, the person's child support arrearage * * *.; (q)  To collaborate with the Mississippi Gaming Commission in order to establish rules and regulations providing for the withholding of cash game winnings, including, but not limited to, slot machine annuities, sports betting and/or other reportable cash winnings of persons who have outstanding child support arrearages. SECTION 42.  This section shall be codified as Section 43-19-63, Mississippi Code of 1972: 43-19-63.  Casinos to exchange certain information with the Mississippi Department of Human Services (MDHS) for noncustodial parents delinquent in child support; participation requirement and duties of casinos and Mississippi Department of Human Services. (1) For purposes of this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed herein, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a) "Cash gaming winnings" means only the cash gaming winnings for which the gaming licensee is required to file Form W2-G, or a substantially equivalent form, with the United States Internal Revenue Service. (b) "Commission" means the Mississippi Gaming Commission. (c) "Child support arrearages" means any obligation owed for the care, support or maintenance of a child, including spousal support that is enforced in conjunction with a child support obligation pursuant to Section 43-19-31 of the Mississippi Code of 1972, which is overdue, unpaid or in arrears. (d) "Gaming licensee" means any entity licensed or permitted to operate gaming operations under current law. (e) "Obligee" means the recipient of Title IV-D services of the Social Security Act to whom child support is owed. (f) "Obligor" means a person who wins a progressive slot machine annuity or cash gaming winnings and has those winnings intercepted due to having child support arrearages. (g) "Progressive slot machine annuity" means only the progressive slot machine annuity winnings for which the gaming licensee is required to file Form W2-G, or a substantially equivalent form, with the United States Internal Revenue Service. (h) "Electronic database access" means the data shared by the Department of Human Services with gaming licensees regarding persons who owe child support arrearages that is updated daily. (2) The commission shall collaborate with the Department of Human Services to promulgate all rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section, including, but not limited to, a procedure requiring the withholding of payments of progressive slot machine annuities and reportable cash gaming winnings of persons who have outstanding child support arrearages, prior to the payment of a progressive slot machine annuity, beginning with the second annuity payment, or cash gaming winnings. (3) The gaming licensee, including any of its officers, employees, attorneys, accountants, or other agents, shall not be civilly or criminally liable to any person, including any customer, for any disclosure of information made in accordance with this section, for encumbering or surrendering assets in response to information provided by the Department of Human Services, or for any claims for damages arising from withholding or failing to withhold any progressive slot machine annuities or cash gaming winnings, based upon information provided to it. (4) If any gaming licensee determines that the winner of a progressive slot machine annuity or cash gaming winnings is a person who has outstanding child support arrearages, the gaming licensee shall deduct the child support arrearage from the payment of the progressive slot machine annuity or cash gaming winnings.  The gaming licensee shall forward the deducted amount to the Department of Human Services within seven (7) days.  The gaming licensee shall pay the remainder to the person who has outstanding child support arrearages.  If the remainder is equal to or less than zero, the person who has an outstanding child support arrearage shall not receive a payment. (5) The Department of Human Services shall release the encumbering game winnings to the obligee after either: (a) A thirty-day period beginning the day the funds are encumbered; or (b) Until such time as the issue of child support arrearages is resolved, provided the obligor has filed a petition for hearing with a court of appropriate jurisdiction and served the Department of Human Services through the Attorney General of the State of Mississippi before the end of the thirty-day period. (6) Grounds for the petition challenging the encumbrance of game winnings shall be limited to the following: (a) Mistakes of identity; or (b) Mistakes in amount of child support arrearages. (7) Any gaming licensee may deduct an administrative fee from each payment of a progressive slot machine annuity, beginning with the second annuity payment, or cash gaming winnings, of persons who have outstanding child support arrearages per singular or periodic payment, not to exceed Thirty-five Dollars ($35.00). (8) If the winner of a progressive slot machine annuity or cash gaming winnings is determined not to owe child support arrearages, then the gaming licensee is not required to access the electronic database for that winner on a subsequent progressive slot machine annuity or cash gaming winnings for an additional twenty-four (24) hours. (9) The commission shall also require that the gaming licensee to adopt procedures designed to prevent employees from willfully failing to withhold payments of progressive slot machine annuities or cash gaming winnings from persons who have outstanding child support arrearages based upon the information provided by the Department of Human Services that allows the gaming licensee to identify such persons. (10) Not later than January 1, 2027, the Commission and Department of Human Services shall institute all policies, procedures and processes as necessary to implement the provisions of this section. SECTION 43.  Section 75-76-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-76-33.  (1)  The commission shall, from time to time, adopt, amend or repeal such regulations, consistent with the policy, objects and purposes of this chapter, as it may deem necessary or desirable in the public interest in carrying out the policy and provisions of this chapter.  The commission shall comply with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law when adopting, amending or repealing any regulations authorized under this section or under any other provision of this chapter. (2)  These regulations shall, without limiting the general powers herein conferred, include the following: (a)  Prescribing the method and form of application which any applicant for a license or for a manufacturer's, seller's or distributor's license must follow and complete before consideration of his application by the executive director or the commission. (b)  Prescribing the information to be furnished by any applicant or licensee concerning his antecedents, habits, character, associates, criminal record, business activities and financial affairs, past or present. (c)  Prescribing the information to be furnished by a licensee relating to his employees. (d)  Requiring fingerprinting of an applicant or licensee, and gaming employees of a licensee, or other methods of identification and the forwarding of all fingerprints taken pursuant to regulation of the Federal Bureau of Investigation. (e)  Prescribing the manner and procedure of all hearings conducted by the commission or any hearing examiner of the commission, including special rules of evidence applicable thereto and notices thereof. (f)  Requiring any applicant to pay all or any part of the fees and costs of investigation of such applicant as may be determined by the commission under paragraph (g) of this subsection (2). (g)  Prescribing the amounts of investigative fees only as authorized by regulations of the commission under paragraph (f) of this subsection, and collecting those fees. The commission shall adopt regulations setting the amounts of those fees at levels that will provide the commission with sufficient revenue, when combined with any other monies as may be deposited into the Mississippi Gaming Commission Fund created in Section 75-76-325, to carry out the provisions of this chapter without any state general funds.  In calculating the amount of such fees, the commission shall: (i)  Attempt to set the fees at levels that will create a balance in the Mississippi Gaming Commission Fund that does not exceed, at the end of any state fiscal year, two percent (2%) of the projected amount of funds that will provide the commission with such sufficient revenue; and (ii)  Demonstrate the reasonableness of the relationship between a fee and the actual costs of the investigative activity for which the fee is being prescribed. (h)  Prescribing the manner and method of collection and payment of fees and issuance of licenses. (i)  Prescribing under what conditions a licensee may be deemed subject to revocation or suspension of his license. (j)  Requiring any applicant or licensee to waive any privilege with respect to any testimony at any hearing or meeting of the commission, except any privilege afforded by the Constitution of the United States or this state. (k)  Defining and limiting the area, games and devices permitted, and the method of operation of such games and devices, for the purposes of this chapter. (l)  Prescribing under what conditions the nonpayment of a gambling debt by a licensee shall be deemed grounds for revocation or suspension of his license. (m)  Governing the use and approval of gambling devices and equipment. (n)  Prescribing the qualifications of, and the conditions under which, attorneys, accountants and others are permitted to practice before the commission. (o)  Restricting access to confidential information obtained under this chapter and ensuring that the confidentiality of such information is maintained and protected. (p)  Prescribing the manner and procedure by which the executive director on behalf of the commission shall notify a county or a municipality wherein an applicant for a license desires to locate. (q)  Prescribing the manner and procedure for an objection to be filed with the commission and the executive director by a county or municipality wherein an applicant for a license desires to locate. (r)  Prescribing the manner and procedure in which child support or child support arrearages may be collected from gaming winnings and slot machine annuities. (3)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each licensee shall be required to comply with the regulation that no wager may be placed by, or on behalf of, any individual or entity or group, not present on a licensed vessel or cruise vessel. (4)  From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law. (5)  From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section. SECTION 44.  Section 93-11-71, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 93-11-71.  (1)  Whenever a court orders any person to make periodic payments of a sum certain for the maintenance or support of a child, and whenever such payments as have become due remain unpaid for a period of at least thirty (30) days, a judgment by operation of law shall arise against the obligor in an amount equal to all payments that are then due and owing. (a)  A judgment arising under this section shall have the same effect and be fully enforceable as any other judgment entered in this state.  A judicial or administrative action to enforce the judgment may be begun at any time; and (b)  Such judgments arising in other states by operation of law shall be given full faith and credit in this state. (2)  Any judgment arising under the provisions of this section shall operate as a lien upon all the property of the judgment debtor, both real and personal, which lien shall be perfected as to third parties without actual notice thereof only upon enrollment on the judgment roll.  The department or attorney representing the party to whom support is owed shall furnish an abstract of the judgment for periodic payments for the maintenance and support of a child, along with sworn documentation of the delinquent child support, to the circuit clerk of the county where the judgment is rendered, and it shall be the duty of the circuit clerk to enroll the judgment on the judgment roll.  Liens arising under the provisions of this section may be executed upon and enforced in the same manner and to the same extent as any other judgment. (3)  Notwithstanding the provisions in subsection (2) of this section, any judgment arising under the provisions of this section shall subject the following assets to interception or seizure without regard to the entry of the judgment on the judgment roll of the situs district or jurisdiction and such assets shall apply to all child support owed including all arrears: (a)  Periodic or lump-sum payments from a federal, state or local agency, including unemployment compensation, workers' compensation and other benefits; (b)  Winnings from lotteries * * *and, gaming winnings * * *that are received in periodic payments made over a period in excess of thirty (30) days and slot machine annuities; and (c)  Assets held in financial institutions; (d)  Settlements and awards resulting from civil actions; (e)  Public and private retirement funds, only to the extent that the obligor is qualified to receive and receives a lump-sum or periodic distribution from the funds; (f)  Lump-sum payments as defined in Section 93-11-101; and (g)  Unclaimed property as described in Section 89-12-1 et seq. (4)  Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, upon disestablishment of paternity granted pursuant to Section 93-9-10 and a finding of clear and convincing evidence including negative DNA testing that the obligor is not the biological father of the child or children for whom support has been ordered, the court shall disestablish paternity and may forgive any child support arrears of the obligor for the child or children determined by the court not to be the biological child or children of the obligor, if the court makes a written finding that, based on the totality of the circumstances, the forgiveness of the arrears is equitable under the circumstances. (5)  In any case in which a child receives assistance from block grants for Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF), and the obligor owes past-due child support, the obligor, if not incapacitated, may be required by the court to participate in any work programs offered by any state agency. (6)  A parent who receives social security disability insurance payments who is liable for a child support arrearage and whose disability insurance benefits provide for the payment of past due disability insurance benefits for the support of the minor child or children for whom the parent owes a child support arrearage shall receive credit toward the arrearage for the payment or payments for the benefit of the minor child or children if the arrearage accrued after the date of disability onset as determined by the Social Security Administration. SECTION 45.  After the date that the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees' System has set the assumed rate of return on investments for the assets of the system at a rate that is equal to or greater than the actuarial assumed rate of return on investments for the assets of the system on January 1, 2020, the State Treasurer, in conjunction with the State Fiscal Officer, shall transfer the sum of Six Hundred Million Dollars ($600,000,000.00) from the Capital Expense Fund (Fund No. 6499C00000) to the Employers' Accumulation Account of the Public Employees' Retirement System created in Section 25-11-123(c). SECTION 46.  This act shall stand repealed on January 1, 2028. SECTION 47.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, however, online sports pool or online race book activities shall commence outside of a licensed gaming premises not later than December 8, 2026.